Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.64.010

Acquisition of by conditional sales contracts.

A code city may exercise the powers relating to acquisition of real or personal property under executory conditional sales contracts as authorized by RCW 39.30.010.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.64.010.]